Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
487D]

RETAIL
MERCHANT CLUB CARDS

Section

487D-1 Definitions

487D-2 Retail merchant club cards; requirements

Note

Personal information protection requirements. L Sp 2008, c
10, §§7 to 15.

Cross References

Information privacy and security council; personal
information security, see §§487N-5 to 7.

Personal information policy and oversight responsibilities
for government agencies, see §487J-5.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next